Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2725
Fee book; contents.

The fee book shall contain an entry of the title of all probate proceedings, the date of each paper issued or filed, and the date of all orders and judgments entered therein together with an exact amount of all fees allowed, taxed and paid in each proceeding, showing the names of the persons entitled to and receiving the same, and for what services such fees were taxed or paid.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 32, p. 270;

Laws 1895, c. 31, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1909, c. 41, § 1, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 1233;

C.S.1922, § 1156;

C.S.1929, § 27-535;

R.S.1943, § 24-537;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 56;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-556.